Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-168.05
Violations; procedure.

The commission may revoke or suspend the license of any manufacturer, wholesaler, or retailer found violating section 53-169, and all proceedings under such section shall be governed by the provisions of the Nebraska Liquor Control Act governing the suspension or revocation of licenses and the appeals to the courts from any orders of the commission.

Laws 1971, LB 751, § 6;

Laws 1985, LB 183, § 4;

Laws 1991, LB 344, § 53.